Utah statutes.
31A-21-505.   Limit on liability.

An insurer that issues a life or accident and health insurance policy to an individual who is the subject of domestic abuse is not liable civilly or criminally for the death of or any injuries to the insured as a result of domestic violence or child abuse beyond the obligations of the insurer under:

(1)  the insurance policy; or

(2)  this title.



Amended by Chapter 116, 2001 General Session

